Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5773.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 16282a. A licensee or registrant shall refer a patient to
a diagnostic center for fetal alcohol spectrum disorder that has
been identified by the department of health and human services as a
center of excellence if the patient is a minor who the licensee or
registrant treats for a condition related to prenatal alcohol
exposure.
Final Page
EMR H06051'26 (H-2) gmd04c